North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 5. Indemnification.

§ 55A-8-50.
Policy statement and definitions.

It is the public policy of this State to enable corporations organized under this Chapter to attract and maintain responsible, qualified directors, officers, employees, and agents, and, to that end, to permit corporations organized under this Chapter to allocate the risk of personal liability of directors, officers, employees, and agents through indemnification and insurance as authorized in this Part.

Definitions in this Part:

“Corporation” includes any domestic or foreign corporation absorbed in a merger which, if its separate existence had continued, would have had the obligation or power to indemnify its directors, officers, employees, or agents, so that a person who would have been entitled to receive or request indemnification from such corporation if its separate existence had continued shall stand in the same position under this Part with respect to the surviving corporation.

“Director” means an individual who is or was a director of a corporation or an individual who, while a director of a corporation, is or was serving at the corporation’s request as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic business or nonprofit corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other enterprise. A director is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the corporation’s request if the director’s duties to the corporation also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, the director to the plan or to participants in or beneficiaries of the plan. “Director” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a director.

“Expenses” means expenses of every kind incurred in defending a proceeding, including counsel fees.

“Liability” means the obligation to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine (including an excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan), or reasonable expenses actually incurred with respect to a proceeding.

“Officer,” “employee,” or “agent” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a person who acted in that capacity.

“Official capacity” means: (i) when used with respect to a director, the office of director in a corporation; and (ii) when used with respect to an individual other than a director, as contemplated in

G.S. 55A-8-56

, the office in a corporation held by the officer or the employment or agency relationship undertaken by the employee or agent on behalf of the corporation. “Official capacity” does not include service for any other foreign or domestic business or nonprofit corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other enterprise.

“Party” includes an individual who was, is, or is threatened to be made a named defendant or respondent in a proceeding.

“Proceeding” means any threatened, pending, or completed action, suit, or proceeding whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative and whether formal or informal.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Subsection (a) of this section is the same as its counterpart in Chapter 55 and is intended to reinforce the broad nonstatutory indemnification permitted by

G.S. 55A-8-57

.

The definition of “corporation” in subdivision (b)(1) is intended to provide that only a surviving corporation in a statutory merger, and not an acquiring corporation in an asset acquisition, will have successor liability for indemnification. The surviving corporation in a statutory merger has both the obligation and the power to indemnify to the same extent as the merging corporation. G.S. 55-8-50(b)(1) was amended in 1993 to accomplish the same purposes. See N.C. Sess. Laws 1993, c. 552, s. 12.

§ 55A-8-51.
Authority to indemnify.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a corporation may indemnify an individual made a party to a proceeding because the individual is or was a director against liability incurred in the proceeding if the individual:

Conducted himself in good faith;

Reasonably believed (i) in the case of conduct in his official capacity with the corporation, that his conduct was in its best interests; and (ii) in all other cases, that his conduct was at least not opposed to its best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe his conduct was unlawful.

A director’s conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose the director reasonably believed to be in the interests of the participants in and beneficiaries of the plan is conduct that satisfies the requirement of clause (ii) of subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of no contest or its equivalent is not, of itself, determinative that the director did not meet the standard of conduct described in this section.

A corporation shall not indemnify a director under this section:

In connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation in which the director was adjudged liable to the corporation; or

In connection with any other proceeding charging improper personal benefit to the director, whether or not involving action in his official capacity, in which the director was adjudged liable on the basis that personal benefit was improperly received by the director.

Indemnification permitted under this section in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation that is concluded without a final adjudication on the issue of liability is limited to reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding.

The authorization, approval, or favorable recommendation by the board of directors of a corporation of indemnification, as permitted by this section, shall not be deemed an act or corporate transaction in which a director has a conflict of interest, and no such indemnification shall be void or voidable on such ground.

History.

1977, c. 236, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 15, 16; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on business associations, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 939 (1977).

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

For article, “Corporate Director and Officer Indemnification: Alternative Methods for Funding,” see 24 Wake Forest L. Rev. 53 (1989).

§ 55A-8-52.
Mandatory indemnification.

Unless limited by its articles of incorporation, a corporation shall indemnify a director who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceedings to which the director was a party because he is or was a director of the corporation against reasonable expenses actually incurred by the director in connection with the proceeding.

History.

1977, c. 236, s. 2; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-53.
Advance for expenses.

Expenses incurred by a director in defending a proceeding may be paid by the corporation in advance of the final disposition of such proceeding as authorized by the board of directors in the specific case or as authorized or required under any provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws or by any applicable resolution or contract upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the director to repay such amount unless it shall ultimately be determined that the director is entitled to be indemnified by the corporation against such expenses.

History.

1977, c. 236, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 15, 16; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on business associations, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 939 (1977).

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

For article, “Corporate Director and Officer Indemnification: Alternative Methods for Funding,” see 24 Wake Forest L. Rev. 53 (1989).

§ 55A-8-54.
Court-ordered indemnification.

Unless a corporation’s articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a director of the corporation who is a party to a proceeding may apply for indemnification to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. On receipt of an application, the court, after giving any notice the court considers necessary, may order indemnification if it determines:

The director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under

G.S. 55A-8-52

, in which case the court shall also order the corporation to pay the director’s reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification; or

The director is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification, in whole or in part, in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether or not the director met the standard of conduct set forth in

G.S. 55A-8-51

or was adjudged liable as described in

G.S. 55A-8-51

(d), but if the director was adjudged so liable, such indemnification is limited to reasonable expenses incurred.

History.

1977, c. 236, s. 2; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-55.
Determination and authorization of indemnification.

A corporation shall not indemnify a director under

G.S. 55A-8-51

unless authorized in the specific case after a determination has been made that indemnification of the director is permissible in the circumstances because the director has met the standard of conduct set forth in

G.S. 55A-8-51

.

The determination shall be made:

By the board of directors by majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors not at the time parties to the proceeding;

If a quorum cannot be obtained under subdivision (1) of this subsection, by a majority vote of a committee duly designated by the board of directors (in which designation directors who are parties may participate), consisting solely of two or more directors not at the time parties to the proceeding;

By special legal counsel (i) selected by the board of directors or its committee in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection; or (ii) if a quorum of the board cannot be obtained under subdivision (1) of this subsection and a committee cannot be designated under subdivision (2) of this subsection, selected by majority vote of the full board (in which selection directors who are parties may participate); or

By the members, but directors who are at the time parties to the proceeding shall not vote on the determination.

Authorization of indemnification and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses shall be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification is permissible, except that if the determination is made by special legal counsel, authorization of indemnification and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses shall be made by those entitled under subdivision (b)(3) of this section to select counsel.

History.

1977, c. 236, s. 2; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

G.S. 55A-16-21

requires the corporation to give members notice of indemnification or the advance of expenses in any direct or derivative action by or on behalf of the corporation.

§ 55A-8-56.
Indemnification of officers, employees, and agents.

Unless a corporation’s articles of incorporation provide otherwise:

An officer of the corporation is entitled to mandatory indemnification under

G.S. 55A-8-52

, and is entitled to apply for court-ordered indemnification under

G.S. 55A-8-54

, in each case to the same extent as a director;

The corporation may indemnify and advance expenses under this Part to an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation to the same extent as to a director; and

A corporation may also indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, or agent to the extent, consistent with public policy, that may be provided by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors, or contract.

History.

1977, c. 236, s. 2; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-57.
Additional indemnification and insurance.

In addition to and separate and apart from the indemnification provided for in

G.S. 55A-8-51

, 55A-8-52, 55A-8-54, 55A-8-55, and 55A-8-56, a corporation may in its articles of incorporation or bylaws or by contract or resolution indemnify or agree to indemnify any one or more of its directors, officers, employees, or agents against liability and expenses in any proceeding (including without limitation a proceeding brought by or on behalf of the corporation itself) arising out of their status as such or their activities in any of the foregoing capacities; provided, however, that a corporation shall not indemnify or agree to indemnify a person against liability or expenses the person may incur on account of his activities which were at the time taken, known, or believed by the person to be clearly in conflict with the best interests of the corporation or if the person received an improper personal benefit. A corporation may likewise and to the same extent indemnify or agree to indemnify any person who, at the request of the corporation, is or was serving as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise or as a trustee or administrator under an employee benefit plan. Any provision in any articles of incorporation, bylaw, contract, or resolution permitted under this section may include provisions for recovery from the corporation of reasonable costs, expenses, and attorneys’ fees in connection with the enforcement of rights to indemnification granted therein and may further include provisions establishing reasonable procedures for determining and enforcing the rights granted therein.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, or who, while a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other enterprise, against liability asserted against or incurred by him in that capacity or arising from his status as a director, officer, employee, or agent, whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify him against the same liability under any provision of this Chapter.

History.

1977, c. 236, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 15, 16; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Subject to one exception, subsections (a) and (b) of this section are the same as subsections (a) and (c) of

G.S. 55-8-57

, based on the theory that the nonstatutory indemnification available to nonprofit corporations under this section should generally be no more restrictive than that available to business corporations. The single exception is that subsection (a) of this section, unlike its counterpart in Chapter 55, prohibits a nonprofit corporation from indemnifying a person “if the person received an improper personal benefit”; the theory being that the nature of a nonprofit corporation makes this additional limitation appropriate. This section also does not contain a counterpart to subsection (b) of

G.S. 55-8-57

, on the theory that the conflict of interest provisions in

G.S. 55A-8-31

should apply to all forms of nonstatutory indemnification under

G.S. 55A-8-57

, regardless of the nature or constituency of the nonprofit corporation and regardless of whether the indemnification is retroactive or prospective.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on business associations, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 939 (1977).

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

For article, “Corporate Director and Officer Indemnification: Alternative Methods for Funding,” see 24 Wake Forest L. Rev. 53 (1989).

§ 55A-8-58.
Application of Part.

If articles of incorporation limit indemnification or advance for expenses, indemnification and advance for expenses are valid only to the extent consistent with the articles of incorporation.

This Part does not limit a corporation’s power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director in connection with appearing as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the director has not been made a named defendant or respondent to the proceeding.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.